Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-867
Quorums.

(a) Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a quorum is present throughout any meeting of the association if persons entitled to cast thirty-five percent of the votes which may be cast for election of the executive board are present in person or by proxy at the beginning of the meeting.

(b) Unless the bylaws specify a larger percentage, a quorum is deemed present throughout any meeting of the executive board if persons entitled to cast fifty percent of the votes on that board are present at the beginning of the meeting.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 43;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 48.